Utah statutes.
35A-8-1503.   Premoratorium customers' eligibility for moratorium -- Criteria.

A residential customer that has had service of an essential utility discontinued for nonpayment prior to the time the moratorium takes effect shall have service restored and continued during the period of the moratorium if the customer meets the requirements of Section 35A-8-1501 and the customer has entered into a deferred payment agreement with the utility as to arrearages.

